Idaho, session 2026, S1339.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 33-320, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 2. That Chapter 3, Title 33, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 33-320, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
33-320. STRATEGIC PERFORMANCE PLANS AND TRAINING. (1) Each school
district and public charter school in Idaho shall develop and submit to the
state department of education a strategic performance plan that has a con-
tinuous focus on innovating and improving:
(a) Student academic proficiency;
(b) Student academic growth;
(c) College and career readiness at the high school level;
(d) Outcomes of at-risk and economically disadvantaged students as de-
fined in section 33-1001, Idaho Code; and
(e) Local school board performance and stewardship of monitoring stu-
dent performance, including compliance with all applicable laws, reg-
ulations, and any terms of a public charter school's performance cer-
tificate.
(2) The local governing board and the school district superintendent
or charter administrator shall collaborate to develop the strategic perfor-
mance plan by coordinating outreach to students, parents, educators, local
industry partners, and the business community, as appropriate.
(3) The strategic performance plan shall:
(a) Set clear and measurable goals for student outcomes and postsec-
ondary achievements, including key indicators for monitoring perfor-
mance, and consider student growth and proficiency goals established by
the state board of education;
(b) Include strategies based on evidence-based research to meet each
goal;
(c) Be data-driven and include student outcomes and growth data in lit-
eracy, math, graduation rates, achievement of individual postsecondary
goals, and any other metric required by the state board of education;
(d) Include a clearly developed and articulated vision and mission;


(e) Outline a plan for the local governing board's continued learning
regarding school board and leadership development in monitoring stu-
dent performance;
(f) Utilize a template developed by the state department of education
or submit required data points in a manner consistent with the state
template; and
(g) At the local governing board's direction, include other areas of
strategic performance that may be necessary to achieve other goals of
the school district or public charter school.
(4) A school district or public charter school may apply to use alterna-
tive student success measures if it demonstrates that a combined twenty-five
percent (25%) or greater of its students include special education students,
homeless students, economically disadvantaged students, students enrolled
in an alternative high school, or English language learners.
(5) Beginning with the 2027-2028 school year, the local governing board
shall adopt and submit its strategic performance plan to the state depart-
ment of education no later than October 1 of each year. In each subsequent
year, the strategic plan shall include an annual progress report on all
established goals. The plan shall cover a period of no less than four (4)
years, including the fiscal year in which the plan is submitted, and shall be
updated annually each summer.
(6) The state board of education shall adopt a matrix to be used by the
state department of education to evaluate a school district's or public
charter school's progress toward the student-outcome goals in its strategic
performance plan. The matrix shall give determinative weight to locally ap-
proved goals and alternative success measures. The matrix shall be adopted
no later than September 1, 2026.
(7) For the purposes of this section, "progress" means measurable im-
provement toward goals identified in a school district's or public charter
school's strategic performance plan. Demonstration of progress may include
but is not limited to student success measures, baselines, benchmarks, and
implementation evidence selected by the school district or public charter
school. Evidence of progress may include but is not limited to:
(a) Year-over-year improvement in student academic growth, profi-
ciency, graduation rates, or postsecondary readiness, as applicable;
(b) Measurable improvement among identified student subgroups, in-
cluding at-risk students and economically disadvantaged students;
(c) Implementation of evidence-based strategies identified in the
strategic performance plan, including documented changes to curricu-
lum, instruction, assessment, professional development, or resource
allocation; and
(d) Demonstrated improvement toward interim benchmarks or milestones
established in the strategic performance plan, provided that long-term
outcome targets may not have been fully achieved yet.
(8)(a) The local governing board shall, at least quarterly, review,
discuss, and approve progress reports on two (2) or more key areas of the
strategic performance plan at a regular or special board meeting.
(b) The state department of education shall evaluate the progress re-
ports to:


(i) Identify high-performing school districts and public char-
ter schools and determine best practices to incorporate into
statewide professional development training; and
(ii) Identify school districts and public charter schools that
are not demonstrating improved student performance.
(9) During an annual evaluation of progress reports, the state de-
partment of education shall recognize the top ten percent (10%) of school
districts and public charter schools that meet or exceed the goals of the
respective strategic performance plans as "schools or districts of educa-
tional excellence."
(10) Flexibility may be granted within the accountability framework for
school districts and public charter schools that demonstrate sustained high
levels of academic achievement. For such districts or charters, account-
ability determinations may include but are not limited to multi-year perfor-
mance trends and overall performance relative to established goals, recog-
nizing that annual growth may not be statistically significant when achieve-
ment levels are consistently high.
(11) If during its annual evaluation of progress reports the state
department of education finds that a school district or public charter
school has not demonstrated progress in achieving a majority of the goals
identified in its strategic performance plan, the superintendent of public
instruction shall:
(a) Support the local governing board and school district superinten-
dent or charter administrator in reassessing and adjusting, if neces-
sary, the plan's strategies while focusing on improved student perfor-
mance;
(b) Support the local governing board and school district superinten-
dent or charter administrator in reviewing school district or public
charter school performance, including in the areas of local budget,
curricula, and professional development, to identify areas hindering
student performance;
(c) Offer recommendations to the local governing board and school dis-
trict superintendent or charter administrator intended to improve the
areas hindering student performance; and
(d) Provide a list of high-performing school districts and public char-
ter schools of similar size and student demographics to offer opportu-
nities for mentorship in areas of evidence-based practices, peer sup-
ports, or locally implemented strategies from high-performing school
districts or public charter schools that may assist in the development
of revised goals or strategies for improvement.
(12) If the state department of education finds that the school district
or public charter school has not demonstrated progress in achieving a major-
ity of the goals identified in its strategic performance plan after two (2)
consecutive annual evaluations of progress reports, the superintendent of
public instruction shall:
(a) Support the local governing board and school district superinten-
dent or charter administrator as required in subsection (11)(a) of this
section;
(b) Direct the state department of education to approve ISAT reme-
diation funds, professional development and literacy budgets, pro-


fessional development plans, and curricular materials that are in
alignment with the school district's or public charter school's student
performance goals; and
(c) Assist the local governing board and school district superinten-
dent or charter administrator with formal training in areas directly
related to the deficiencies in meeting strategic performance plan
goals.
(13) If the state department of education finds that a school district
or public charter school has not demonstrated progress in achieving a major-
ity of the goals identified in its strategic performance plan after three (3)
consecutive annual reviews of progress reports, the superintendent of pub-
lic instruction shall:
(a) Support the local governing board and school district superinten-
dent or charter administrator as required in subsection (11)(a) and (b)
of this section; and
(b) Direct the state department of education to conduct a comprehensive
review of school district and public charter school operations, includ-
ing a review of instructional calendars. The state department of educa-
tion shall have final approval of instructional calendars for the next
school year.
(14) Regarding a public charter school's performance, the superinten-
dent of public instruction shall consult with the charter school's autho-
rizer in addition to the local governing board.
(15) Upon request, the superintendent of public instruction shall
present an annual report to the house of representatives and senate edu-
cation committees regarding school districts and public charter schools
with high performance based on the respective strategic performance plans
adopted pursuant to this section.
(16) The strategic performance plan provided for in this section shall
be made available to the public and posted on the school district or public
charter school website.
(17) Of the moneys appropriated in the public school educational sup-
port program, up to six thousand six hundred dollars ($6,600) shall be dis-
tributed to each school district and public charter school to be expended for
school board and leadership development training. Funds utilized for ad-
ministrator mentorships shall be capped at twenty-five percent (25%) of such
distribution. Funds shall be distributed on a reimbursement basis based on a
process prescribed by the superintendent of public instruction. To qualify
for reimbursement, training shall cover strategic performance planning, fi-
nance, ethics, governance, superintendent evaluations, and public charter
administrator evaluations.
(18) A public charter school may use its performance certificate crite-
ria and framework toward fulfilling the requirements provided in subsection
(1) of this section.
(19) The state department of education is authorized to withhold a por-
tion of funds for any school district or public charter school that does not
submit its strategic performance plan by the date required in this section.
The amount of withheld funds shall be proportional to the administrative
burden and state resources expended due to the noncompliance. The withheld


funds shall be returned to the school district or public charter school upon
the submission of the outstanding strategic performance plan.
(20) Any reporting requirements for school districts and public char-
ter schools as of July 1, 2026, that are not federally mandated, necessary
for public school finance purposes, or related to the professional standards
commission shall be eliminated.
SECTION 3. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.